District of Columbia statutes.
29-411.06

Discontinuance or settlement.

A derivative proceeding shall not be discontinued or settled without the Superior Court’s approval. If the court determines that a proposed discontinuance or settlement will substantially affect the interests of the members or a class of members of the nonprofit corporation, the court shall direct that notice be given to the members affected.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-411.08.

Section References